Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.31.050

Charter code cities—Provisions cumulative.

Nothing herein shall be construed as in anywise modifying, limiting, or repealing any valid provision of the charter of any charter code city relating to such claims for damages, except when in conflict herewith, but the provisions hereof shall be in addition to such charter provisions, and such claims for damages, in all other respects, shall conform to and comply with such charter provisions.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.31.050.]